Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-277
Property conveyed to Brownville; management.

Property conveyed by
the Game and Parks Commission pursuant to section 90-276 is conveyed with
the intent that the property continue to be managed for public access and
for public outdoor recreation opportunities, in a safe and sanitary manner,
and in compliance with all relevant provisions and responsibilities outlined
within prior covenants, easements, and agreements hereby transferred, including
continued maintenance of the federally funded public boating access facilities
existing on the property, which is specifically assigned through 2013.

Laws 2011, LB621, § 2.